Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-259
Evaluation; motion for release of juvenile in custody.

The juvenile, his or her attorney, parent, guardian, or custodian may file a motion to release the juvenile from custody and request a hearing after the initial commitment order for evaluation provided in section 43-258 is entered. Pending the hearing on such application, the juvenile shall remain in custody in such manner as the court determines to be in the best interests of the juvenile, taking into account the results of a standardized juvenile detention screening instrument as provided in section 43-260.01.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 15;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 17.